District of Columbia statutes.
10-1221.08

Payment and security.

Except as may be otherwise provided in this subchapter, the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on, the bonds shall be payable solely from proceeds received from the sale of the bonds, income realized from the temporary investment of those proceeds, receipts and revenues realized by the District and deposited in the New Convention Center Hotel Fund, and income realized from the temporary investment of those receipts and revenues.

History

Sept. 19, 2006, D.C. Law 16-163, § 108, 53 DCR 5430

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 108 of New Convention Center Hotel Omnibus Financing and Development Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-404, June 26, 2006, 53 DCR 5404).